Maryland, session 2025, SB0190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:

SENATE BILL 190 3
Article – Land Use
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) (1) “Legislative body” means the elected body of a local jurisdiction.
(2) “Legislative body” includes:
(i) the board of county commissioners;
(ii) the county council; and
(iii) the governing body of a municipal corporation.
4–104.
(a) In this section, “modular dwelling” means a building assembly or system of
building subassemblies designed for habitation as a dwelling for one or more individuals:
(1) that includes the necessary electrical, plumbing, heating, ventilating,
and other service systems;
(2) that is made or assembled by a manufacturer on or off the building site
for installation, or assembly and installation, on the building site; and
(3) installed and set up according to the manufacturer’s instructions on an
approved foundation and support system.
(b) The powers granted to a local jurisdiction under this subtitle do not:
(1) grant the local jurisdiction powers in any substantive area not
otherwise granted to the local jurisdiction by any other public general or public local law;
(2) restrict the local jurisdiction from exercising any power granted to the
local jurisdiction by any other public general or public local law or otherwise;
(3) authorize the local jurisdiction or its officers to engage in any activity
that is beyond their power under any other public general or public local law or otherwise;
or
(4) preempt or supersede the regulatory authority of any unit of the State
under any public general law.

SENATE BILL 190
(c) (1) (I) If a legislative body regulates off–street parking, the legislative
body shall require space for the parking of bicycles in a manner that the legislative body
considers appropriate.
[(2)] (II) A legislative body may allow a reduction in the number of
required automobile parking spaces based on the availability of space for parking bicycles.
(2) A LEGISLATIVE BODY MAY NOT IMPOSE A MINIMUM OFF–STREET
PARKING REQUIREMENT ON A RESIDENTIAL OR MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT THAT IS
LOCATED WITHIN 0.5 MILES OF A RAIL TRANSIT STATION.
(d) A legislative body may not prohibit the placement of a new manufactured
home or modular dwelling in a zone that allows single–family residential uses if the home
or dwelling:
(1) (i) meets the definition of modular dwelling under subsection (a) of
this section; or
(ii) meets the definition of a manufactured home in § 9–102(a) of the
Commercial Law Article and is, or will be after purchase, converted to real property in
accordance with Title 8B, Subtitle 2 of the Real Property Article; or
(2) is located on land:
(i) currently or previously owned by the federal government;
(ii) greater than 80 acres in size; and
(iii) that was the site of a former U.S. military reservation.
(E) A LEGISLATIVE BODY MAY NOT TAKE AN ACTION TO PRECLUDE
MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN 0.5 MILES OF A RAIL TRANSIT
STATION.
(F) FOR STATE–OWNED LAND IN USE FOR A TRANSPORTATION PURPOSE
ADJACENT TO A TRANSIT STATION, A LEGISLATIVE BODY MAY NOT IMPOSE LOCAL
ZONING RESTRICTIONS IF THE LAND IS SUBJECT TO A TRANSIT–ORIENTED
DEVELOPMENT PLAN APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION.
Article – Local Government
21–508.
(a) The governing body of a county may provide for the imposition of an ad
valorem or special tax on all real and personal property in a special taxing district at a rate
or amount designed to provide adequate revenue:

SENATE BILL 190 5
(4) to pay costs of infrastructure improvements located in or supporting a
transit–oriented development or a State hospital redevelopment;
(5) to pay costs of operating and maintaining infrastructure improvements
located in or supporting a transit–oriented development or a State hospital redevelopment;
or
(c) (1) As an alternative to imposing ad valorem taxes under this subtitle, the
governing body of a county may impose special taxes in accordance with this subsection on
property in a special taxing district.
(2) In determining the basis for and amount of a special tax, the cost of an
improvement may be calculated and imposed:
(i) equally per front foot, lot, parcel, dwelling unit, or square foot;
(ii) according to the value of the property, with or without regard to
improvements on the property; or
(iii) in any other reasonable manner that results in a fair allocation
of the cost of the infrastructure improvements.
(3) The governing body of a county may enact an ordinance or a resolution
for:
(i) the maximum amount of a special tax to be imposed on any
parcel;
(ii) the tax year or other date after which further special taxes under
this subtitle may not be imposed on a parcel; and
(iii) whether, and the circumstances under which, a special tax on a
parcel may be increased because of delinquency or default by the owner of that parcel or by
the owner of any other parcel.
(4) By ordinance or resolution, the governing body of a county may
establish procedures allowing for the prepayment of special taxes under this subtitle.
(5) A special tax imposed under this subtitle shall:
(i) unless otherwise provided in an ordinance or a resolution, be
collected and secured in the same manner as general ad valorem taxes; [and]
(ii) in the case of delinquency, be subject to the same penalties,
procedure, sale, and lien priority as general ad valorem taxes; AND

SENATE BILL 190
(III) FOR A SPECIAL TAX IMPOSED FOR THE BENEFIT OF
TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT, BE EXEMPT FROM ANY COUNTY TAX
LIMITATION OR BOND CAP.
(6) THE REVENUES GENERATED BY A SPECIAL TAX IMPOSED FOR THE
BENEFIT OF TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT BY A COUNTY UNDER PARAGRAPH
(4) OR (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE DISTRIBUTED TO A TOD CORRIDOR FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–1302 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
11–203.
(L) THIS DIVISION II DOES NOT APPLY TO A TRANSIT–ORIENTED
DEVELOPMENT UNDER TITLE 7 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
Article – Transportation
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(p) “Transit–oriented development” means a mix of private or public parking
facilities, commercial and residential structures, and uses, improvements, and facilities
customarily appurtenant to such facilities and uses, that:
(1) Is part of a deliberate development plan or strategy involving:
(i) Property that is adjacent to the passenger boarding and alighting
location of a planned or existing transit station;
(ii) Property, any part of which is located within one–half mile of the
passenger boarding and alighting location of a planned or existing transit station; or
(iii) Property that is adjacent to a planned or existing transit corridor;
(2) Is planned to maximize the use of transit, walking, and bicycling by
residents and employees; and
(3) Is designated as a transit–oriented development by:
(i) The Smart Growth Subcabinet established under § 9–1406 of the
State Government Article; and
(ii) The local government or multicounty agency with land use and
planning responsibility for the relevant area applying for designation.

SENATE BILL 190 7
7–1201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Fund” means the Transit–Oriented Development Capital Grant and
Revolving Loan Fund.
7–1203.
(c) (1) The Fund consists of:
(i) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(ii) Money made available for qualifying uses by the Fund from other
governmental sources, including eligible federal funding and the Transportation Trust
Fund;
(iii) Ground rents or land sale proceeds in accordance with §
10–306(c)(2) of the State Finance and Procurement Article;
(iv) Payments of principal of and interest on loans made under this
title;
(v) Investment earnings of the Fund; [and]
(vi) PROCEEDS FROM BONDS ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT
UNDER THIS TITLE; AND
(VII) Any other money from any other source, public or private,
accepted for the benefit of the Fund.
(2) Contributions to the Fund under paragraph (1)(iii) of this subsection
shall[:
(i) Be] BE separately accounted for in the Fund[; and
(ii) Be used only for the benefit of transit–oriented developments in
the same county where the real property subject to the ground rent or land sale is located].
7–1204.
(a) (1) The Fund may be used by the Department to provide financial
assistance to local jurisdictions for:

SENATE BILL 190
(i) PLANNING EFFORTS FOR A SITE ADJACENT TO TRANSIT
THAT IS NOT DESIGNATED AS A TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT TO PREPARE
THAT SITE FOR SUCH DESIGNATION;
(II) Design plans for a transit–oriented development, provided that
the transit–oriented development will be designed to meet equity goals established by the
Department;
[(ii)] (III) Public infrastructure improvements within a
transit–oriented development; or
[(iii)] (IV) Gap funding AND FINANCING for COSTS ASSOCIATED
WITH public or private development within a transit–oriented development.
(2) A private entity, including a nonprofit entity, participating in the
development of a transit–oriented development may partner with a local jurisdiction to
submit an application for financial assistance under paragraph [(1)(iii)] (1)(IV) of this
subsection.
SUBTITLE 13. TOD CORRIDOR FUNDS.
7–1301.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COUNTY SPECIAL TAXING DISTRICT” MEANS A TAXING DISTRICT
ESTABLISHED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY UNDER TITLE 21, SUBTITLE
5 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(C) “TOD CORRIDOR FUND” MEANS A FUND ESTABLISHED AND
ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO SUPPORT TRANSIT–ORIENTED
DEVELOPMENT ADJACENT TO A PLANNED OR EXISTING TRANSIT CORRIDOR.
7–1302.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH TOD CORRIDOR FUNDS TO
COLLECT REVENUES FROM COUNTY SPECIAL TAXING DISTRICTS ESTABLISHED TO
BENEFIT TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT.
(B) A TOD CORRIDOR FUND MAY BE USED WITHIN APPLICABLE SPECIAL
TAXING DISTRICTS TO:

SENATE BILL 190 9
(1) SUPPORT THE ISSUANCE OF BONDS FOR TRANSIT–ORIENTED
DEVELOPMENT–RELATED ACTIVITIES;
(2) PROVIDE A DEDICATED SOURCE OF REVENUES TO REPAY
FEDERAL LOANS FOR TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT; AND
(3) SUPPORT OTHER FINANCING ACTIVITIES FOR THE BENEFIT OF
TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That § 4–104(e) of the Land Use
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall apply only to land use rezonings or actions
taken by a legislative body on or after the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.